Utah statutes.
67-5-31.   Mortgage and Financial Fraud Investigation and Prosecution Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Mortgage and Financial Fraud Investigation and Prosecution Restricted Account."

(2)  The restricted account includes:

(a)  $2,000,000 of deposits from the foreclosure fraud settlement agreement between the United States Justice Department, United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, and a bipartisan group of state attorneys general, including Utah's attorney general, Bank of America, Citi, JP Morgan Chase, GMAC, and Wells Fargo announced in February 2012; and

(b)  any other amount appropriated by the Legislature.

(3)  Money from the restricted account shall be used by the attorney general to:

(a)  investigate and prosecute mortgage and financial fraud throughout the state; and

(b)  fund mortgage and financial fraud investigation and prosecution staff.



Enacted by Chapter 350, 2012 General Session

